North Dakota, session 69, SB2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL - CONSULTANTS FOR
INTERIM STUDY - ONE-TIME FUNDING.
There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $49,500, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
legislative council for the purpose of contracting with a consultant to study the feasibility and
desirability of creating a regenerative grazing ranch in the state, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a
one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - REGENERATIVE GRAZING
PRACTICES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the feasibility and
desirability of recognizing rangeland ecosystems as a sink for atmospheric carbon
dioxide and researching the role of regenerative grazing practices on carbon fluxes
within the state. The study must:
a. Collect scientific data necessary to understand regenerative grazing effects on
atmospheric carbon dioxide fluxes, rangeland productivity, and other ecosystem
services;
b. Determine a platform for ranchers and stakeholders to connect and learn how
regenerative grazing practices alter carbon and water fluxes with a working cattle
herd and how this data could improve ranching sustainability;
Page No. 1 25.0900.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. Determine whether establishing a regenerative grazing ranch, which would be
known as grand ranch and would function similar to grand sky and grand farm,
would bolster the energy and ranching industries of the state;
d. Identify sustainable rangeland carbon management practices and funding
sources and organizations interested in working with ranchers and stakeholders;
e. Implement grazing management as part of the carbon solution relating to beef
production and carbon yields; and
f. Receive input from the agriculture commissioner, department of mineral
resources, and stakeholders from the ranching and energy industries of the state.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth
legislative assembly.
Page No. 2 25.0900.02000